New York, session 2025-2026, S1065.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2586-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2586-b. Three King's day school holiday. 1. The sixth day of Janu- 4 ary, commonly known as Three King's day, is hereby made and declared to 5 be a holiday for all public schools in a qualified school district. 6 2. A qualified school district, for purposes of this section, shall 7 mean a city school district of a city having a population of one million 8 or more inhabitants. 9 3. The school authorities of a qualified school district are hereby 10 authorized and directed to cause all public schools within such district 11 to be closed on Three King's day. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amend- 14 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 15 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 16 completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00435-02-5